Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1593.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6111(f)(2) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is repealed:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms.* * *(f) Application of section.--* * *[(2) The provisions contained in subsections (a) and (c) shall only apply to pistols or revolvers with a barrel length of less than 15 inches, any shotgun with a barrel length of less than 18 inches, any rifle with a barrel length of less than 16 inches or any firearm with an overall length of less 1234567891011121314151617 than 26 inches.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1593PN1905 - 2 - 123